Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that the climate commitment act currently exempts from a compliance obligation fuels supplied in an amount below 25,000 metric tons of associated carbon dioxide equivalent annually. In establishing this exemption, it was never the intent of the legislature to put large fuel suppliers at a competitive disadvantage in the fuel supply marketplace relative to other fuel suppliers. However, the legislature finds that current trends in the fuel supply market indicate that the existing structure for assigning compliance obligations may establish incentives that lead to actions being taken by market participants that undercut principles of fair competition in the fuel supply market.(2) So that the program created by this act does not create uneven economic conditions for businesses in Washington, it is the intent of the legislature that:(a) The climate commitment act's assignment of compliance obligations associated with fuels ensure that there is a covered entity associated with all fuel supplied or otherwise produced, imported, or delivered in Washington, except in de minimis volumes; and(b) The department of ecology should seek to enforce the requirements of the climate commitment act as they pertain to fuel suppliers equally and even-handedly throughout Washington, including with respect to different types of covered entities and in all geographic regions of the state, including in overburdened communities.Sec. 2. RCW 70A.65.080 and 2025 c 282 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A person is a covered entity as of the beginning of the first compliance period and all subsequent compliance periods if the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 for any calendar year from 2015 through 2019, or if additional data provided as required by this chapter indicates that emissions for any calendar year from 2015 through 2019 equaled or exceeded any of the following thresholds, or if the person is a first jurisdictional deliverer and imports electricity into the state during the compliance period:(a) Where the person owns or operates a facility and the facility's emissions equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent;(b) Where the person is a first jurisdictional deliverer and generates electricity in the state and emissions associated with this generation equals or exceeds 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent;(c)(i) Where the person is a first jurisdictional deliverer importing electricity into the state and:(A) For specified sources, the cumulative annual total of emissions associated with the imported electricity exceeds 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent;(B) For unspecified sources, the cumulative annual total of emissions associated with the imported electricity exceeds 0 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent; or(C) For electricity purchased from a federal power marketing administration pursuant to section 5(b) of the Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation act of 1980, P.L. 96-501, if the department determines such electricity is not from a specified source, the cumulative annual total of emissions associated with the imported electricity exceeds 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.(ii) In consultation with any linked jurisdiction to the program created by this chapter, by October 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with the department of commerce and the utilities and transportation commission, shall adopt by rule a methodology for addressing imported electricity associated with a centralized electricity market;(d) Where the person is a supplier of fossil fuel other than natural gas and from that fuel 25,000 metric tons or more of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions would result from the full combustion or oxidation, excluding the amounts for fuel products that are produced or imported with a documented final point of delivery outside of Washington and combusted outside of Washington; and(e)(i) Where the person supplies natural gas in amounts that would result in exceeding 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions if fully combusted or oxidized, excluding the amounts for fuel products that are produced or imported with a documented final point of delivery outside of Washington and combusted outside of Washington, and excluding the amounts: (A) Supplied to covered entities under (a) through (d) of this subsection; and (B) delivered to opt-in entities;(ii) Where the person who is not a natural gas company and has a tariff with a natural gas company to deliver to an end-use customer in the state in amounts that would result in exceeding 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions if fully combusted or oxidized, excluding the amounts: (A) Supplied to covered entities under (a) through (d) of this subsection; and (B) the amounts delivered to opt-in entities;(iii) Where the person is an end-use customer in the state who directly purchases natural gas from a person that is not a natural gas company and has the natural gas delivered through an interstate pipeline to a distribution system owned by the purchaser in amounts that would result in exceeding 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions if fully combusted or oxidized, excluding the amounts: (A) Supplied to covered entities under (a) through (d) of this subsection; and (B) delivered to opt-in entities.(2)(a) A person is a covered entity as of the beginning of the second compliance period and all subsequent compliance periods if ((the)):(i) The person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided emissions data as required by this chapter for any calendar year from 2023 through 2025, where the person owns or operates a waste to energy facility utilized by a county and city solid waste management program and the facility's emissions equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent; or(ii) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the person is a supplier of any combination of gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane, and the person:(A) Began producing, importing, delivering, or selling gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane in any jurisdiction before January 1, 2023, and the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 for any calendar year beginning in 2027 or any year thereafter for any combination of gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane supplied in Washington, the full combustion or oxidation of which would result in 25,000 metric tons or more of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions in a calendar year, excluding the amounts for fuel products that are produced or imported with a documented final point of delivery outside of Washington and combusted outside of Washington; or(B)(I) Except as provided in (a)(ii)(B)(II) of this subsection, began producing, importing, delivering, or selling gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane in any jurisdiction on or after January 1, 2023, and the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 for any calendar year beginning in 2027 or any year thereafter for any combination of gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane, the full combustion or oxidation of which would result in 500 metric tons or more of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions in a calendar year, excluding the amounts for fuel products that are produced or imported with a documented final point of delivery outside of Washington and combusted outside of Washington.(II) If a person who is otherwise covered under (a)(ii)(B)(I) of this subsection demonstrates to the department that the person transports 100 percent of any combination of gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane in a company-owned vehicle with a valid United States department of transportation number and international fuel tax agreement number issued by the department of licensing and that the person began producing, importing, delivering, or selling gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane in any jurisdiction before January 1, 2024, the threshold specified in (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection applies to that person.(b) The department may, by rule, lower or increase any of the thresholds specified in (a)(ii)(A) or (B) of this subsection if practicable and if necessary to ensure the achievement of the goals of this chapter or eliminate significant distortions in the fuel supply marketplace. A rule adopted under this subsection (2)(b) must take effect at least one year after the initiation of the rule making, and no earlier than January 1st of the following calendar year of program implementation.(3) A person is a covered entity as of the beginning of the third compliance period, and all subsequent compliance periods if the person reported emissions under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided emissions data as required by this chapter for 2027 or 2028, where the person owns or operates a railroad company, as that term is defined in RCW 81.04.010, and the railroad company's emissions equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent.(4) When a covered entity reports, during a compliance period, emissions from a facility under RCW 70A.15.2200 that are below the thresholds specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the covered entity continues to have a compliance obligation through the current compliance period. When a covered entity reports emissions below the threshold for each year during an entire compliance period, or has ceased all processes at the facility requiring reporting under RCW 70A.15.2200, the entity is no longer a covered entity as of the beginning of the subsequent compliance period unless the department provides notice at least 12 months before the end of the compliance period that the facility's emissions were within 10 percent of the threshold and that the person will continue to be designated as a covered entity in order to ensure equity among all covered entities. Whenever a covered entity ceases to be a covered entity, the department shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature of the name of the entity and the reason the entity is no longer a covered entity.(5) For types of emission sources described in subsection (1) of this section that begin or modify operation after January 1, 2023, and types of emission sources described in subsection (2) of this section that begin or modify operation after 2027, coverage under the program starts in the calendar year in which emissions from the source exceed the applicable thresholds in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or upon formal notice from the department that the source is expected to exceed the applicable emissions threshold, whichever happens first. Sources meeting these conditions are required to transfer their first allowances on the first transfer deadline of the year following the year in which their emissions were equal to or exceeded the emissions threshold.(6) For emission sources described in subsection (1) of this section that are in operation or otherwise active between 2015 and 2019 but were not required to report emissions for those years under RCW 70A.15.2200 for the reporting periods between 2015 and 2019, coverage under the program starts in the calendar year following the year in which emissions from the source exceed the applicable thresholds in subsection (1) of this section as reported pursuant to RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter, or upon formal notice from the department that the source is expected to exceed the applicable emissions threshold for the first year that source is required to report emissions, whichever happens first. Sources meeting these criteria are required to transfer their first allowances on the first transfer deadline of the year following the year in which their emissions, as reported under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter, were equal to or exceeded the emissions threshold.(7) The following emissions are exempt from coverage in the program, regardless of the emissions reported under RCW 70A.15.2200 or provided as required by this chapter:(a) Emissions from the combustion of aviation fuels;(b) Emissions from watercraft fuels supplied in Washington that are combusted outside of Washington;(c) Emissions from a coal-fired electric generation facility exempted from additional greenhouse gas limitations, requirements, or performance standards under RCW 80.80.110;(d) Carbon dioxide emissions from the combustion of biomass or biofuels;(e)(i) Motor vehicle fuel or special fuel that is used exclusively for agricultural purposes by a farm fuel user. This exemption is available only if a buyer of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Prior to January 1, 2030, this exemption is available whether motor vehicle fuel or special fuel is used to propel a motor vehicle or not, but beginning January 1, 2030, this exemption only applies to motor vehicle fuel or special fuel that the farm fuel user uses to propel a motor vehicle.(ii) The department must determine a method for expanding the exemption provided under (e)(i) of this subsection to include fuels used for the purpose of transporting agricultural products on public highways. The department must maintain this expanded exemption until December 31, 2029, in order to provide the agricultural sector with a feasible transition period.(iii) For the purposes of this subsection:(A) "Agricultural purposes" and "farm fuel user" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 82.08.865;(B) "Motor vehicle fuel" means gasoline, the chief use of which is as a fuel for the propulsion of motor vehicles or vessels; and(C) "Special fuel" means diesel, liquefied petroleum gas (also called propane), and biodiesel;(f) Emissions from facilities with North American industry classification system code 92811 (national security); ((and))(g) Emissions from municipal solid waste landfills that are subject to, and in compliance with, chapter 70A.540 RCW; and(h) Beginning January 1, 2027, emissions from the combustion, oxidation, other process, or end use of a lubricant, as that term is defined as of January 1, 2026 in 40 C.F.R. Sec. 98.6. This exemption applies regardless of whether a supplier demonstrates to the department that a lubricant is not combusted or oxidized.(8) The department shall not require multiple covered entities to have a compliance obligation for the same emissions. The department may by rule authorize refineries, fuel suppliers, facilities using natural gas, and natural gas utilities to provide by agreement for the assumption of the compliance obligation for fuel or natural gas supplied and combusted in the state. The department must be notified of such an agreement at least 12 months prior to the compliance obligation period for which the agreement is applicable.(9)(a) The legislature intends to promote a growing and sustainable economy and to avoid leakage of emissions from manufacturing to other locations. The legislature further intends to see innovative new businesses locate and grow in Washington that contribute to Washington's prosperity and environmental objectives.(b) Consistent with the intent of the legislature to avoid the leakage of emissions to other jurisdictions, in achieving the state's greenhouse gas limits in RCW 70A.45.020, the state, including lead agencies under chapter 43.21C RCW, shall pursue the limits in a manner that recognizes that the siting and placement of new or expanded best-in-class facilities with lower carbon emitting processes is in the economic and environmental interests of the state of Washington.(c) In conducting a life-cycle analysis, if required, for new or expanded facilities that require review under chapter 43.21C RCW, a lead agency must evaluate and attribute any potential net cumulative greenhouse gas emissions resulting from the project as compared to other existing facilities or best available technology including best-in-class facilities and emerging lower carbon processes that supply the same product or end use. The department may adopt rules to determine the appropriate threshold for applying this analysis.(d) Covered emissions from an entity that is or will be a covered entity under this chapter may not be the basis for denial of a permit for a new or expanded facility. Covered emissions must be included in the analysis undertaken pursuant to (c) of this subsection. Nothing in this subsection requires a lead agency or a permitting agency to approve or issue a permit to a permit applicant, including to a new or expanded fossil fuel project.(e) A lead agency under chapter 43.21C RCW or a permitting agency shall allow a new or expanded facility that is a covered entity or opt-in entity to satisfy a mitigation requirement for its covered emissions under this chapter and under any greenhouse gas emission mitigation requirements for covered emissions under chapter 43.21C RCW by submitting to the department the number of compliance instruments equivalent to its covered emissions during a compliance period.Sec. 3. RCW 70A.15.2200 and 2025 c 320 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The board of any activated authority or the department, may classify air contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation, which in its judgment may cause or contribute to air pollution, according to levels and types of emissions and other characteristics which cause or contribute to air pollution, and may require registration or reporting or both for any such class or classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state as a whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall be made with special reference to effects on health, economic and social factors, and physical effects on property.(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any person operating or responsible for the operation of air contaminant sources of any class for which the ordinances, resolutions, rules or regulations of the department or board of the authority, require registration or reporting shall register therewith and make reports containing information as may be required by such department or board concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information as is relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of being assembled. In the case of emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70A.45.010 the department shall adopt rules requiring reporting of those emissions. The department or board may require that such registration or reporting be accompanied by a fee, and may determine the amount of such fee for such class or classes: PROVIDED, That the amount of the fee shall only be to compensate for the costs of administering such registration or reporting program which shall be defined as initial registration and annual or other periodic reports from the source owner providing information directly related to air pollution registration, on-site inspections necessary to verify compliance with registration requirements, data storage and retrieval systems necessary for support of the registration program, emission inventory reports and emission reduction credits computed from information provided by sources pursuant to registration program requirements, staff review, including engineering or other reliable analysis for accuracy and currentness, of information provided by sources pursuant to registration program requirements, clerical and other office support provided in direct furtherance of the registration program, and administrative support provided in directly carrying out the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any such registration made with either the board or the department shall preclude a further registration and reporting with any other board or the department, except that emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70A.45.010 must be reported as required under subsection (5) of this section.All registration program and reporting fees collected by the department shall be deposited in the air pollution control account. All registration program fees collected by the local air authorities shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.(3) If a registration or report has been filed for a grain warehouse or grain elevator as required under this section, registration, reporting, or a registration program fee shall not, after January 1, 1997, again be required under this section for the warehouse or elevator unless the capacity of the warehouse or elevator as listed as part of the license issued for the facility has been increased since the date the registration or reporting was last made. If the capacity of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or elevator under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or elevator receives grain from the first harvest season that occurs after the increase in its capacity is listed in the license.This subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain elevator if the warehouse or elevator handles more than 10,000,000 bushels of grain annually.(4) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section:(a) A "grain warehouse" or "grain elevator" is an establishment classified in standard industrial classification (SIC) code 5153 for wholesale trade for which a license is required and includes, but is not limited to, such a licensed facility that also conducts cleaning operations for grain;(b) A "license" is a license issued by the department of agriculture licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued by the federal government licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain elevator for purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter 22.09 RCW; and(c) "Grain" means a grain or a pulse.(5)(a) The department shall adopt rules requiring persons to report emissions of greenhouse gases as defined in RCW 70A.45.010 where those emissions from a single facility, or from fossil fuels sold in Washington by a single supplier or local distribution company, meet or exceed 10,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent annually, or from fossil fuels specified in RCW 70A.65.080(2)(a) sold in Washington by a single person specified in RCW 70A.65.080(2)(a)(ii), where those emissions meet or exceed the lesser of 10,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent or the threshold specified in RCW 70A.65.080(2)(a), or set by the department by rule in accordance with its authority under RCW 70A.65.080(2)(b), for such persons. The department's rules may also require electric power entities to report emissions of greenhouse gases from all electricity that is purchased, sold, imported, exported, or exchanged in Washington. To the extent practicable, the department's rules must seek to minimize reporting burdens through the utilization of existing reports and disclosures for electric power entities who report greenhouse gas emissions that equal 10,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent or less annually from all electricity that is purchased, sold, imported, exported, or exchanged in Washington. The rules adopted by the department must support implementation of the program created in RCW 70A.65.060. In addition, the rules must require that:(i) Emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the combustion of fossil fuels be reported separately from emissions of greenhouse gases resulting from the combustion of biomass; and(ii)(A) Except as provided in (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection, each annual report must include emissions data for the preceding calendar year and must be submitted to the department by March 31st of the year in which the report is due, except for an electric power entity, which must submit its report by June 1st of the year in which the report is due;(B) To ensure that the program created in chapter 70A.65 RCW remains implementable and capable of fulfilling a linkage agreement under RCW 70A.65.210, if the department determines that timely reporting under this section is infeasible due to actions attributable to a third party upon whom the agency relies to collect emissions data from entities required to report including, but not limited to, the United States environmental protection agency, the department may, by rule, including emergency rule, require any greenhouse gas emissions reports for emissions in any combination of the years 2024 through 2030 to be submitted at an alternate date of no later than June 1, 2031.(b)(i) The department may by rule include additional gases to the definition of "greenhouse gas" in RCW 70A.45.010 only if the gas has been designated as a greenhouse gas by the United States congress, by the United States environmental protection agency, or included in external greenhouse gas emission trading programs with which Washington has linked pursuant to RCW 70A.65.210. Prior to including additional gases to the definition of "greenhouse gas" in RCW 70A.45.010, the department shall notify the appropriate committees of the legislature.(ii) The department may by rule exempt persons who are required to report greenhouse gas emissions to the United States environmental protection agency and who emit less than 10,000 metric tons carbon dioxide equivalent annually.(iii) The department must establish greenhouse gas emission reporting methodologies for persons who are required to report under this section. The department's reporting methodologies must be designed to address the needs of ensuring accuracy of reported emissions and maintaining consistency over time, and may, to the extent practicable, be similar to reporting methodologies of jurisdictions with which Washington has entered into a linkage agreement.(iv) The department must establish a methodology for persons who are not required to report under this section to voluntarily report their greenhouse gas emissions.(c) The department shall share any reporting information reported to it with the local air authority in which the person reporting under the rules adopted by the department operates.(d) The fee provisions in subsection (2) of this section apply to reporting of emissions of greenhouse gases. Persons required to report under (a) of this subsection who fail to report or pay the fee required in subsection (2) of this section are subject to enforcement penalties under this chapter. The department shall enforce the reporting rule requirements. When a person that holds a compliance obligation under RCW 70A.65.080 fails to submit an emissions data report or fails to obtain a positive emissions data verification statement in accordance with (f)(ii) of this subsection, the department may assign an emissions level for that person.(e) The energy facility site evaluation council shall, simultaneously with the department, adopt rules that impose greenhouse gas reporting requirements in site certifications on owners or operators of a facility permitted by the energy facility site evaluation council. The greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed by the energy facility site evaluation council must be the same as the greenhouse gas reporting requirements imposed by the department. The department shall share any information reported to it from facilities permitted by the energy facility site evaluation council with the council, including notice of a facility that has failed to report as required. The energy facility site evaluation council shall contract with the department to monitor the reporting requirements adopted under this section.(f)(i) The department must establish by rule the methods of verifying the accuracy of emissions reports.(ii) Verification requirements apply at a minimum to persons required to report under (a) of this subsection with emissions that equal or exceed 25,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent emissions, including carbon dioxide from biomass-derived fuels, or to persons who have a compliance obligation under RCW 70A.65.080 in any year of the current compliance period. The department may adopt rules to accept verification reports from another jurisdiction with a linkage agreement pursuant to RCW 70A.65.180 in cases where the department deems that the methods or procedures are substantively similar.(g)(i) The definitions in RCW 70A.45.010 apply throughout this subsection (5) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(ii) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "supplier" includes: (A) Suppliers that produce, import, or deliver, or any combination of producing, importing, or delivering, a quantity of fuel products in Washington that, if completely combusted, oxidized, or used in other processes, would result in the release of greenhouse gases in Washington equivalent to or higher than the threshold established under (a) of this subsection; and (B) suppliers of carbon dioxide that produce, import, or deliver a quantity of carbon dioxide in Washington that, if released, would result in emissions equivalent to or higher than the threshold established under (a) of this subsection.(iii) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "person" includes: (A) An owner or operator of a facility; (B) a supplier; or (C) an electric power entity.(iv) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "facility" includes facilities that directly emit greenhouse gases in Washington equivalent to the threshold established under (a) of this subsection with at least one source category listed in the United States environmental protection agency's mandatory greenhouse gas reporting regulation, 40 C.F.R. Part 98 Subparts C through II and RR through UU, as adopted on April 25, 2011.(v) For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term "electric power entity" includes any of the following that supply electric power in Washington with associated emissions of greenhouse gases equal to or above the threshold established under (a) of this subsection: (A) Electricity importers and exporters; (B) retail providers, including multijurisdictional retail providers; and (C) first jurisdictional deliverers, as defined in RCW 70A.65.010, not otherwise included here.Sec. 4. RCW 70A.65.090 and 2021 c 316 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All covered entities must register to participate in the program, following procedures adopted by the department by rule.(2) Entities registering to participate in the program must describe any direct or indirect affiliation with other registered entities.(3) A person responsible for greenhouse gas emissions that is not a covered entity may voluntarily participate in the program by registering as an opt-in entity. An opt-in entity must satisfy the same registration requirements as covered entities. Once registered, an opt-in entity is allowed to participate as a covered entity in auctions and must assume the same compliance obligation to transfer compliance instruments equal to their emissions at the appointed transfer dates. An opt-in entity may opt out of the program at the end of any compliance period by providing written notice to the department at least six months prior to the end of the compliance period. The opt-in entity continues to have a compliance obligation through the current compliance period. An opt-in entity is not eligible to receive allowances directly distributed under RCW 70A.65.110, 70A.65.120, or 70A.65.130.(4) A person that is not covered by the program and is not a covered entity or opt-in entity may voluntarily participate in the program as a general market participant. General market participants must meet all applicable registration requirements specified by rule.(5) Federally recognized tribes and federal agencies may elect to participate in the program as opt-in entities or general market participants.(6) The department shall use a secure, online electronic tracking system to: Register entities in the state program; issue compliance instruments; track ownership of compliance instruments; enable and record compliance instrument transfers; facilitate program compliance; and support market oversight.(7) The department must use an electronic tracking system that allows two accounts to each covered or opt-in entity:(a) A compliance account where the compliance instruments are transferred to the department for retirement. Compliance instruments in compliance accounts may not be sold, traded, or otherwise provided to another account or person.(b) A holding account that is used when a registered entity is interested in trading allowances. Allowances in holding accounts may be bought, sold, transferred to another registered entity, or traded. The amount of allowances a registered entity may have in its holding account is constrained by the holding limit as determined by the department by rule. Information about the contents of each holding account, including but not limited to the number of allowances in the account, must be displayed on a regularly maintained and searchable public website established and updated by the department.(8) Registered general market participants are each allowed an account, to hold, trade, sell, or transfer allowances.(9) The department shall maintain an account for the purpose of retiring allowances transferred by registered entities and from the voluntary renewable reserve account.(10) The department shall maintain a public roster of all covered entities, opt-in entities, and general market participants on the department's public website. The roster must specify the provision of RCW 70A.65.080 (1), (2), or (3) under which each covered entity is determined to be a covered entity, and must identify any fuel sellers described in RCW 70A.65.200(1)(b).(11) The department shall include a voluntary renewable reserve account.Sec. 5. RCW 70A.65.200 and 2024 c 352 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) All covered and opt-in entities are required to submit compliance instruments in a timely manner to meet the entities' compliance obligations and shall comply with all requirements for monitoring, reporting, holding, and transferring emission allowances and other provisions of this chapter.(b) In addition to the penalty provisions of this section, a seller of any combination of gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane fuel must meet the requirements of section 6 of this act in order to be eligible to receive any contract awarded by the state, any state agency, or any municipality.(2) If a covered or opt-in entity does not submit sufficient compliance instruments to meet its compliance obligation by the specified transfer dates, a penalty of four allowances for every one compliance instrument that is missing must be submitted to the department within six months. When a covered entity or opt-in entity reasonably believes that it will be unable to meet a compliance obligation, the entity shall immediately notify the department. Upon receiving notification, the department shall issue an order requiring the entity to submit the penalty allowances.(3) If a covered entity or opt-in entity fails to submit penalty allowances as required by subsection (2) of this section, the department must issue an order or issue a penalty of up to $10,000 per day per violation, or both, for failure to submit penalty allowances as required by subsection (2) of the section. The order may include a plan and schedule for coming into compliance.(4) The department may issue a penalty of up to $50,000 per day per violation for violations of RCW 70A.65.100(8) (a) through (e).(5) Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, any person that violates the terms of this chapter or an order issued under this chapter incurs a penalty of up to $10,000 per day per violation for each day that the person does not comply. All penalties under subsections (3) and (4) of this section and this subsection must be deposited into the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250.(6) Orders and penalties issued under this chapter are appealable to the pollution control hearings board under chapter 43.21B RCW.(7) Until the department enters into a linkage agreement or until the end of the first compliance period, whichever is sooner, the department may reduce the amount of the penalty by adjusting the monetary amount or the number of penalty allowances described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.(8) An electric utility or natural gas utility must notify its retail customers and the environmental justice council in published form within three months of paying a monetary penalty under this section.(9)(a) No city, town, county, township, or other subdivision or municipal corporation of the state may implement a charge or tax based exclusively upon the quantity of greenhouse gas emissions.(b) No state agency may adopt or enforce a greenhouse gas pricing or market-based emissions cap and reduce program for stationary sources, or adopt or enforce emission limitations on greenhouse gas emissions from stationary sources except as:(i) Provided in this chapter;(ii) Authorized or directed by a state statute in effect as of July 1, 2022; or(iii) Required to implement a federal statute, rule, or program.(c) This chapter preempts the provisions of chapter 173-442 WAC, and the department shall repeal chapter 173-442 WAC.(((10)(a) By December 1, 2023, the office of financial management must submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature that summarizes two categories of state laws other than this chapter:(i) Laws that regulate greenhouse gas emissions from stationary sources, and the greenhouse gas emission reductions attributable to each chapter, relative to a baseline in which this chapter and all other state laws that regulate greenhouse gas emissions are presumed to remain in effect; and(ii) Laws whose implementation may effectuate reductions in greenhouse gas emissions from stationary sources.(b) The state laws that the office of financial management may address in completing the report required in this subsection include, but are not limited to:(i) Chapter 19.27A RCW;(ii) Chapter 19.280 RCW;(iii) Chapter 19.405 RCW;(iv) Chapter 36.165 RCW;(v) Chapter 43.21F RCW;(vi) Chapter 70.30 RCW;(vii) Chapter 70A.15 RCW;(viii) Chapter 70A.45 RCW;(ix) Chapter 70A.60 RCW;(x) Chapter 70A.535 RCW;(xi) Chapter 80.04 RCW;(xii) Chapter 80.28 RCW;(xiii) Chapter 80.70 RCW;(xiv) Chapter 80.80 RCW; and(xv) Chapter 81.88 RCW.(c) The office of financial management may contract for all or part of the work product required under this subsection.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 39.26 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a seller of any combination of gasoline, diesel, biodiesel, or propane fuel is only eligible to receive a contract awarded by the state, any state agency, or any municipality, if the seller:(a) Is registered with the department of ecology as a covered or opt-in entity under chapter 70A.65 RCW; or(b) Can provide documentation, including but not limited to invoices, demonstrating that the fuel being sold was purchased from a covered or opt-in entity registered with the department under chapter 70A.65 RCW and the emissions from the fuel are covered emissions for the covered or opt-in entity.(2) For purposes of this section, "municipality" means every city, county, town, special purpose district, political subdivision, or instrumentality of the state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---